Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB803.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the First-Time Homebuyer Savings Account Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Account." A first-time homebuyer savings account established under section 5."Account holder." An individual who is a first-time homebuyer and establishes, individually or jointly, an account."Allowable closing costs." A disbursement listed on a 12345678910111213141516171819 settlement statement for the purchase of a single-family residence in this Commonwealth by a qualified beneficiary."Department." The Treasury Department of the Commonwealth."Eligible costs." A down payment and allowable closing costs for the purchase of a single-family residence in this Commonwealth by a qualified beneficiary. The term does not include costs incurred prior to the establishment of an account."Financial institution." A bank, trust company, savings institution, credit union, broker-dealer, insurance company or mutual fund or similar entity authorized to do business in this Commonwealth."First-time homebuyer." An individual who resides in this Commonwealth and has not owned or purchased directly or through a trust, limited liability company, partnership or other legal entity, either individually or jointly, a single-family residence in this Commonwealth or another state."Fund." The First-time Homebuyer Savings Account Fund established under section 4(c)."Program." The First-time Homebuyer Savings Account Program established under section 4."Qualified beneficiary." A first-time homebuyer who is designated as a qualified beneficiary by the account holder of an account."Settlement statement." A statement of receipts and disbursements from a real estate transaction, including a statement prescribed under 12 U.S.C. Ch. 27 (relating to real estate settlement procedures)."Single-family residence." A single-family residence owned and occupied by a qualified beneficiary as the qualified beneficiary's principal residence, which may include a 20250SB0803PN0851 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 manufactured home, trailer, mobile home or unit in a condominium, cooperative or planned community."Tax Reform Code of 1971." The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.Section 3. First-time Homebuyer Savings Account Bureau.The First-time Homebuyer Savings Account Bureau is established within the department for the purpose of administering the program.Section 4. First-time Homebuyer Savings Account Program.(a) Establishment.--The First-time Homebuyer Savings Account Program is established in the department.(b) Application.--The application for the program shall be on a form and in a manner prescribed by the department which shall be available on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(c) Administration.--The department may utilize the administrative and investment structures of the Tuition Account Investment Program established by the act of April 3, 1992 (P.L.28, No.11), known as the Tuition Account Programs and College Savings Bond Act, or the Pennsylvania ABLE Savings Program established by the act of April 18, 2016 (P.L.128, No.17), known as the Pennsylvania ABLE Act, without separately soliciting proposals for assistance in the management of all or part of the program.(d) Investment manager, program manager and trustee.--The department may contract with one or more persons or legal entities to serve as investment managers, program managers and trustees on behalf of the program. If the department contracts with investment managers, program managers or trustees to fulfill the objectives of the program, the investment managers, 20250SB0803PN0851 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 program managers and trustees shall work with the department to provide a program to develop investment portfolios and to supervise investments and investment programs.(e) Powers and duties of department.--The department shall have the powers necessary or convenient to carry out this act, including the power to:(1) Administer the program and the fund, including the use of investment managers, program managers and trustees to assist in establishing and administering the program and fund.(2) Enter into contracts with individuals for the establishment of accounts.(3) Contract for goods and services, and engage and employ personnel, including, but not limited to, the services of private consultants, actuaries, managers, legal counsel and auditors for rendering professional, managerial and technical assistance and advice.(4) Charge and collect administrative fees and charges in connection with any transaction, including continued participation in the program.(5) Close an account and return any balance in the account, minus any fee, to the account holder.(6) Contract for insurance, letters of credit and collateral agreements.(7) Adjust the terms of contracts with account holders.(8) Promulgate regulations to implement this act.(9) Take other action necessary to carry out the purpose of this act and incidental to the duties imposed on the department.(f) Fund.--20250SB0803PN0851 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The First-time Homebuyer Savings Account Fund is established in the State Treasury.(2) The fund shall consist of:(i) All contributions made by account holders and all interest, earnings and additions thereto.(ii) Any other money, public or private, appropriated or made available to the department for the fund from any source and all interest, earnings and additions thereto.(3) The department shall annually submit to the General Assembly a budget request outlining the operating and administrative expenses of the program.(4) Assets of the fund shall be preserved, invested and expended solely for the purposes specified in this act.(5) The department shall repay from the fees, charges and investment earnings of the fund to the General Fund any money appropriated for the initial planning, organization and administration of the program. The repayment shall occur when there are enough assets sufficient to defray the costs of the program, as determined by the department.(6) The department may not pledge the credit or taxing powers of the Commonwealth. Any obligation or debt under this section shall not be deemed an obligation or debt of the Commonwealth, nor shall the Commonwealth be liable to pay principal and interest on obligations or to offset any loss of principal and interest earnings on investments made by the department.(7) The policies governing the investment of the fund shall be directed to obtaining sufficient income to meet the fund's obligations under this act, maintaining necessary 20250SB0803PN0851 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reserves and covering operating expenses. The policies governing the fund shall be directed to providing for an appropriate balance of risk, liquidity and return commensurate with the management of a prudent investor. The department, its investment managers, program managers and trustees shall have the authority to invest and reinvest money in the fund in all lawful investments.Section 5. First-time homebuyers savings account.(a) Approval.--Upon approval from the department into the program, an individual may establish a first-time homebuyer savings account.(b) Designation and change of qualified beneficiary.--(1) An account holder shall designate no more than one first-time homebuyer as the qualified beneficiary of the account. The account holder may, at any time, designate the account holder as the qualified beneficiary or change the designated qualified beneficiary.(2) The account holder must designate an individual as the qualified beneficiary under paragraph (1) by certifying that the qualified beneficiary is eligible under this act in a form and manner determined by the department.(3) If the qualified beneficiary becomes ineligible under this act, the account holder must notify the department in a form and manner determined by the department and change the designated qualified beneficiary. If the account holder fails to change the designated qualified beneficiary under this paragraph, the department shall close the account and distribute the money in the account to the account holder under section 8.(c) Use of account.--Money from an account may only be used 20250SB0803PN0851 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to pay or reimburse a qualified beneficiary's eligible costs for the purchase of a single-family residence in this Commonwealth.(d) Joint account holders.--An account holder may jointly own an account with another individual if the joint account holders file a joint personal income tax return under Article III of the Tax Reform Code of 1971.(e) Qualified beneficiary of more than one account.--An individual may be designated as the qualified beneficiary on more than one account.(f) Contributions to account.--(1) Subject to the limitations under section 6(d), an individual other than the account holder may contribute to an account.(2) The maximum amount of all contributions to an account shall be $150,000.Section 6. Deduction and exclusion from taxable income.(a) Deduction of contributions.--Except as otherwise provided under subsection (c), the amount contributed by an account holder to an account during each tax year:(1) May not exceed $5,000 for an account holder who files an individual personal income tax return or $10,000 for joint account holders who file a joint personal income tax return.(2) Shall be deductible, up to the contribution limits under paragraph (1), from the taxable income of the account holder under Article III of the Tax Reform Code of 1971 during the tax year the contribution was made.(b) Exclusion of earnings.--Except as otherwise provided under subsection (c), the amount of earnings on an account during the tax year may be excluded from the taxable income of 20250SB0803PN0851 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 an account holder under Article III of the Tax Reform Code of 1971.(c) Limitations on deductions and exclusions.--An account holder may claim a deduction and exclusion under this section:(1) For a period of no more than 10 years.(2) For an aggregate amount of principal not to exceed $50,000 within 10 years.(3) If the principal and earnings of an account remain in the account until a withdrawal is made for the eligible costs relating to the purchase of a single-family residence by a qualified beneficiary.(d) Nonaccount holders.--An individual other than the account holder who deposits money into an account under section 5(f) is not entitled to the deduction and exclusion provided for under this section.(e) Remaining money.--Money in an account not expended on eligible costs before expiration of the 10-year period under subsection (c)(1) shall be included in the account holder's taxable income as interest under Article III of the Tax Reform Code of 1971.Section 7. Distribution of money.Upon proof of the death of an account holder, a financial institution shall distribute the account in accordance with the contract terms governing the account.Section 8. Withdrawal for purpose other than eligible costs.If an account holder or qualified beneficiary withdraws any amount from an account and uses the withdrawal for a purpose other than eligible costs:(1) The entire amount withdrawn shall be included in the account holder's taxable income as interest income under 20250SB0803PN0851 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Article III of the Tax Reform Code of 1971 for the tax year the withdrawal was made.(2) The account holder or qualified beneficiary shall pay to the department a penalty equal to 10% of the amount withdrawn, which penalty may be deducted by the department from the balance of the account. The penalty may not apply to:(i) a withdrawal from the account by reason of the account holder's or the qualified beneficiary's death or disability; or(ii) a disbursement of assets of the account pursuant to a filing for protection under 11 U.S.C. (relating to bankruptcy).Section 9. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250SB0803PN0851 - 9 - 123456789101112131415